Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-202
Compulsory attendance; withdrawal of child from school; exempt from mandatory attendance; exit interview; withdrawal form; validity; child at least sixteen years of age; other enrollment options; later enrollment; effect; Commissioner of Education; duties.

(1) A person who has legal or actual charge or control of a child who is at least sixteen years of age but less than eighteen years of age may withdraw such child from school before graduation and be exempt from the mandatory attendance requirements of section 79-201 if an exit interview is conducted and the withdrawal form is signed as required by subsections (2) through (5) of this section for a child enrolled in a public, private, denominational, or parochial school or if a signed release form is filed with the Commissioner of Education as required by subsection (6) of this section for a child enrolled in a school that elects pursuant to section 79-1601 not to meet accreditation or approval requirements.

(2) Upon the written request of any person who has legal or actual charge or control of a child who is at least sixteen years of age but less than eighteen years of age, the superintendent of a school district or the superintendent's designee shall conduct an exit interview if the child (a) is enrolled in a school operated by the school district or (b) resides in the school district and is enrolled in a private, denominational, or parochial school.

(3) The superintendent or the superintendent's designee shall set the time and place for the exit interview which shall be personally attended by: (a) The child, unless the withdrawal is being requested due to an illness of the child making attendance at the exit interview impossible or impracticable; (b) the person who has legal or actual charge or control of the child who requested the exit interview; (c) the superintendent or the superintendent's designee; (d) the child's principal or the principal's designee if the child at the time of the exit interview is enrolled in a school operated by the school district; and (e) any other person requested by any of the required parties who agrees to attend the exit interview and is available at the time designated for the exit interview which may include, but need not be limited to, other school district personnel or the child's principal or such principal's designee if the child is enrolled in a private, denominational, or parochial school.

(4) At the exit interview, the person making the written request pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall present evidence that (a) the person has legal or actual charge or control of the child and (b) the child would be withdrawing due to either (i) financial hardships requiring the child to be employed to support the child's family or one or more dependents of the child or (ii) an illness of the child making attendance impossible or impracticable. The superintendent or superintendent's designee shall identify all known alternative educational opportunities, including vocational courses of study, that are available to the child in the school district and how withdrawing from school is likely to reduce potential future earnings for the child and increase the likelihood of the child being unemployed in the future. Any other relevant information may be presented and discussed by any of the parties in attendance.

(5)(a) At the conclusion of the exit interview, the person making the written request pursuant to subsection (2) of this section may sign the withdrawal form provided by the school district agreeing to the withdrawal of the child or may rescind the written request for the withdrawal.

(b) Any withdrawal form signed by the person making the written request pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall be valid only if (i) the child signs the form unless the withdrawal is being requested due to an illness of the child making attendance at the exit interview impossible or impracticable and (ii) the superintendent or superintendent's designee signs the form acknowledging that the interview was held, the required information was provided and discussed at the interview, and, in the opinion of the superintendent or the superintendent's designee, the person making the written request pursuant to subsection (2) of this section does in fact have legal or actual charge or control of the child and the child is experiencing either (A) financial hardships requiring the child to be employed to support the child's family or one or more dependents of the child or (B) an illness making attendance impossible or impracticable.

(6) A person who has legal or actual charge or control of the child who is at least sixteen years of age but less than eighteen years of age may withdraw such a child before graduation and be exempt from the mandatory attendance requirements of section 79-201 if such child has been enrolled in a school that elects pursuant to section 79-1601 not to meet the accreditation or approval requirements by filing with the State Department of Education a signed release on a form prescribed by the Commissioner of Education.

(7) A child who has been withdrawn from school pursuant to this section may enroll in a school district at a later date as provided in section 79-215 or may enroll in a private, denominational, or parochial school or a school which elects pursuant to section 79-1601 not to meet accreditation or approval requirements. Any such enrollment shall void the withdrawal form previously entered, and the provisions of sections 79-201 to 79-210 shall apply to the child.

(8) The commissioner shall prescribe the required form for withdrawals pursuant to this section and determine and direct either that (a) withdrawal forms of school districts for any child who is withdrawn from school pursuant to this section and subdivision (3)(c) of section 79-201 shall be provided annually to the department or (b) data regarding such students shall be collected under subsection (2) of section 79-528.

Laws 2012, LB996, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB528, § 21.